Alaska, session 34, SB78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 23.10 is amended by adding new sections to read: 05 Article 9. Disclosure of Employee Compensation. 06 Sec. 23.10.700. Disclosure or discussion of wages. (a) An employer who 07 publishes a notice, advertisement, or other solicitation for employment shall include in 08 the notice, advertisement, or other solicitation a description of the compensation, 09 including the salary or range of salaries, for the position. 10 (b) An employer may not 11 (1) prohibit an employee or applicant for employment from disclosing 12 the employee's or applicant's compensation or discussing or asking about the 13 compensation of another; 14 (2) ask an applicant for employment about compensation the applicant 01 may have received from another employer; or 02 (3) prohibit an employee or applicant for employment from helping or 03 encouraging another individual to exercise a right under this subsection. 04 (c) Nothing in this section 05 (1) creates an obligation for an employee or applicant for employment 06 to disclose information about the employee's or applicant's compensation or the 07 compensation of another; 08 (2) prohibits an employee or applicant for employment from 09 voluntarily disclosing to an employer information about the employee's or applicant's 10 compensation; 11 (3) prohibits an employer from considering or relying on information 12 disclosed under (2) of this subsection when determining the compensation of an 13 employee or applicant for employment. 14 Sec. 23.10.705. Posting summary required. An employer subject to 15 AS 23.10.700 - 23.10.740 shall keep a summary of the requirements in AS 23.10.700 - 16 23.10.740 approved by the commissioner and post the summary in a conspicuous 17 location at a place where an employee is employed. Upon request, the commissioner 18 shall provide a copy of the summary to an employer without charge. 19 Sec. 23.10.710. Retaliation prohibited. An employer may not discharge, 20 discipline, threaten, discriminate against, or penalize an employee for exercising a 21 right under AS 23.10.700 - 23.10.740 or participating in or benefitting from a 22 complaint, claim, trial, agreement, or investigation resulting from an alleged violation 23 of AS 23.10.700 - 23.10.740. 24 Sec. 23.10.715. Damages for retaliation. An employee who has been 25 discharged, disciplined, threatened, discriminated against, or penalized in violation of 26 AS 23.10.710 may file a civil claim against the employer for damages, including 27 reinstatement and lost wages, separate from and in addition to a fine recoverable by 28 the state under AS 23.10.725. 29 Sec. 23.10.720. Statute of limitations. An action under AS 23.10.715 may be 30 filed not later than three years after the injury to the aggrieved employee last occurs. 31 Sec. 23.10.725. Penalty. (a) A violation of AS 23.10.700 - 23.10.740 or a 01 regulation or order of the commissioner issued under AS 23.10.700 - 23.10.740 is 02 punishable by a fine of not less than $100 and not more than $2,000 as determined by 03 the commissioner. 04 (b) Each day a violation occurs may constitute a separate violation as 05 determined by the commissioner. 06 (c) If an employer conducts an internal audit for the purpose of avoiding or 07 correcting violations of AS 23.10.700 - 23.10.740, the commissioner may reduce the 08 amount of a fine otherwise payable under this section. 09 Sec. 23.10.730. Regulations. The commissioner shall adopt regulations under 10 AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement and interpret AS 23.10.700 - 11 23.10.740. 12 Sec. 23.10.740. Definitions. In AS 23.10.700 - 23.10.740, 13 (1) "employee" means a natural person, other than an independent 14 contractor, in the service of an employer; 15 (2) "employer" means the state, the University of Alaska, the Alaska 16 Railroad Corporation, a political subdivision of the state, and a person who employs 17 one or more employees. 18 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 19 read: 20 APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to compensation for services performed on or 21 after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.